South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4967.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 3, Title 24 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 24-3-990.  State and local detention or correctional facilities must provide welfare notices to family members of inmates upon request. These notices must contain, but are not limited to, the inmate's physical and mental health, and safety status. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----